Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773 of Title 15, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 1

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Fair
Renewal Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.1 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Automatic renewal contract” means a plan or arrangement in
which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement is automatically
renewed at the end of a definite term for a subsequent term or on a
continuous or recurring basis;
2. “Automatic renewal offer terms” means the following clear
and conspicuous disclosures:
a. notification that an automatic renewal contract will
automatically renew or extend after the initial period
for a set term not to exceed one (1) year unless the
consumer gives express written consent for a longer
renewal term,
b. a description of the cancellation policy that applies
to the offer,
c. any recurring charges that will be charged to the
consumer’s credit card, debit card, or payment account
with a third party as part of an automatic renewal
contract,
d. the length of an automatic renewal term, or
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 2

e. the minimum purchase obligation, if any;
3. “Clear and conspicuous” or “clearly and conspicuously”
means:
a. in larger type than the surrounding text,
b. in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding
text of the same size,
c. set off from the surrounding text of the same size by
symbols or other marks in a manner that clearly calls
attention to the language, or
d. in the case of an audio disclosure, in a volume and
cadence sufficient to be readily audible and
understandable;
4. “Consumer” means an individual who seeks or acquires, by
purchase or lease, any goods, services, money, or credit for
personal, family, or household purposes; and
5. “Trial period offer” means a solicitation offering a
consumer a period of time in which to sample a product or service,
which offer is used as an inducement for the consumer to make a
purchase of the product or service or a similar product or service.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.2 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A person or entity that offers an automatic renewal contract
to a consumer in this state shall:
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 3

1. Present the automatic renewal offer terms in a clear and
conspicuous manner before the automatic renewal contract is
executed;
2. Provide the consumer with a written acknowledgment that
includes the automatic renewal offer terms, the cancellation policy,
and information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable
of being physically or electronically retained by the consumer; and
3. If the offer of an automatic renewal contract includes a
trial period offer:
a. include a clear and conspicuous explanation of the
price that will be charged and any further purchase
obligations that shall be imposed on the consumer
after the trial period ends,
b. disclose in the written acknowledgment, pursuant to
paragraph 2 of this subsection, the manner in which a
consumer may cancel the automatic renewal contract,
and
c. allow a consumer to cancel the contract before the
consumer is required to pay for the goods or services.
B. It shall be unlawful for a person or entity that offers an
automatic renewal contract to a consumer in this state to utilize an
online link that is presented as part of an offer of an automatic
renewal contract, in which the online link directs the consumer to

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 4

deta iled information about the automatic renewal contract, unless
the online link:
1. Is available before a consumer elects to purchase any good
or service subject to the automatic renewal contract;
2. Appears directly adjacent to any online link used by the
consumer to purchase any good or service subject to the automatic
renewal contract; and
3. Is labeled with, or is directly adjacent to, a clear and
conspicuous disclosure that states that by purchasing the good or
service, the consumer agrees to enroll in an automatic renewal
contract.
C. A person or entity that offers an automatic renewal contract
to a consumer in this state shall provide a simple and readily
accessible mechanism for canceling an automatic renewal contract or
trial period offer, which shall be:
1. A direct online cancellation link that is:
a. located on the website of the person or entity, within
the consumer’s account or profile, or contained in an
electronic device or service, or an electronic
communication to the consumer, and
b. available to the consumer immediately or directly
after the consumer completes a reasonable
authentication protocol used solely to confirm that

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 5

the consumer is authorized to make changes to the
account; or
2. An in-person mechanism for canceling an automatic renewal
contract or trial period offer at a physical location where the
consumer regularly utilizes any goods or services that are subject
to the automatic renewal contract.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.3 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If a material change occurs in the terms of an automatic renewal
contract that has been accepted by a consumer in this state, the
person or entity offering the automatic renewal contract shall
provide to the consumer:
1. A clear and conspicuous notice of the material change; and
2. Information regarding cancellation of the automatic renewal
contract pursuant to Section 3 of this act.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.4 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A person or entity that sells a good or service to a consumer
pursuant to an automatic renewal contract shall notify the consumer
that the contract shall automatically renew unless the consumer
cancels the contract. The notice shall:

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 6

1. Inform the consumer of the process of cancelling the
contract;
2. Provide clear and accurate information regarding the
identity of the sender;
3. Provide a cancellation mechanism pursuant to Section 3 of
this act;
4. Be provided by one of the following methods:
a. physical mail,
b. electronic mail,
c. mobile phone application, or
d. text message, if such communication has been
authorized by the customer; and
5. Be sent no fewer than fifteen (15) days and no more than
forty-five (45) days prior to the automatic renewal of the contract
when the contract has an initial term of one (1) year that renews
for more than one (1) month.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.5 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The provisions of this act shall not apply to:
1. A service provided by a person pursuant to a franchise
issued by a political subdivision of the state or a license,
franchise, certificate, or other authorization issued by the
Corporation Commission;
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 7

2. A service provided by a person or entity, or an affiliate or
subsidiary that is regulated by the Federal Communications
Commission, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, or the
Corporation Commission;
3. Any person or entity regulated by the Insurance Department,
or an affiliate of such person or entity;
4. A bank or bank holding company that is licensed under state
or federal law, or a subsidiary or affiliate of such bank or bank
holding company;
5. A credit union or other financial institution that is
licensed under state or federal law;
6. An air carrier as defined in and regulated under the Federal
Aviation Act of 1958, 49 U.S.C., Section 40101 et seq., as amended,
including the federal Airline Deregulation Act of 1978, 49 U.S.C.,
Section 41713, as amended;
7. An entity regulated by the Department of Labor under the
Alarm, Locksmith and Fire Sprinkler Industry Act; or
8. Any newspaper qualified and authorized to publish legal or
public notices pursuant to Section 106 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.6 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 8

Any violation of this act shall be enforceable exclusively by
the Attorney General and the district attorneys of this state except
when provided for in Section 761.1 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.”

Passed the Senate the 6th day of May, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives









ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 9

ENGR OSSED HOUSE
BILL NO. 1851 By: Schreiber and Deck of the
House
and
Gollihare of the Senate


[ contracts - Oklahoma Fair Renewal Act - automatic
renewal contracts - offer terms - online link -
written acknowledgement - notice of material
changes - notice of contract renewal - exceptions -
unlawful business practice - codification -
effective date ]


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773 of Title 15, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Fair
Renewal Act".
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.1 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act, the following terms shall mean:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 1

A. "Automatic renewal contract" means a plan or arrangement in
which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement is automatically
renewed at the end of a definite term for a subsequent term or on a
continuous or recurring basis.
B. "Automatic renewal offer terms" means the following clear
and conspicuous disclosures:
1. That an automatic renewal contract will automatically renew
or extend after the initial period for a set term not to exceed one
(1) year unless the consumer gives express written consent for a
longer renewal term;
2. A description of the cancellation policy that applies to the
offer;
3. Any recurring charges that will be charged to the consumer's
credit card, debit card, or payment account with a third party as
part of an automatic renewal contract;
4. The length of an automatic renewal term; and
5. The minimum purchase obligation, if any.
C. 1. "Clear and conspicuous" or "clearly and conspicuously"
means in larger type than the surrounding text; in contrasting type,
font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size; or set off
from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks
in a manner that clearly calls attention to the language; or


ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 2

2. In the case of an audio disclosure, "clear and conspicuous"
or "clearly and conspicuously" means in a volume and cadence
sufficient to be readily audible and understandable.
D. "Consumer" means an individual who seeks or acquires, by
purchase or lease, any goods, services, money, or credit for
personal, family, or household purposes.
E. "Trial period offer" means a solicitation offering a
consumer a period of time in which to sample a product or service,
which offer is used as an inducement for the consumer to make a
purchase of the product or service or a similar product or service.
SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.2 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. It is unlawful for a person who offers an automatic renewal
contract to a consumer in this state to:
1. Fail to present the automatic renewal offer terms in a clear
and conspicuous manner before the automatic renewal contract is
executed. In the case of an offer that is conveyed by voice, the
person must present the terms in temporal proximity to the request
for the consumer's consent to the offer. If the offer includes a
trial period offer, the offer must also include a clear and
conspicuous explanation of the price that will be charged and any
further purchase obligations that will be imposed on the consumer
after the trial period ends;
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 3

2. Utilize an online link that is presented as part of an offer
of an automatic renewal contract, which online link directs a
consumer to detailed information about the automatic renewal
contract, unless the online link:
a. is available before a consumer elects to purchase any
good or service subject to the automatic renewal
contract,
b. appears directly adjacent to any online link used by
the consumer to purchase any good or service subject
to the automatic renewal contract, and
c. is labeled with, or is directly adjacent to, a clear
and conspicuous disclosure that states that by
purchasing the good or service, the consumer agrees to
enroll in an automatic renewal contract;
3. Fail to provide the consumer a written acknowledgment that
includes the automatic renewal offer terms, the cancellation policy,
and information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable
of being retained by the consumer. If the offer of an automatic
renewal contract includes a trial period offer, the person shall
also disclose in the written acknowledgment how the consumer may
cancel the automatic renewal contract, and the person shall allow
the consumer to cancel the contract before the consumer is required
to pay for the goods or services;

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 4

4. Fail to provide a simple, cost-effective, timely, easy-to-
use, and readily accessible mechanism for canceling an automatic
renewal contract or trial period offer. A person is deemed to
comply with this paragraph if the person offers:
a. a direct online cancellation link that is:
(1) located on the person's website, within the
consumer's account or profile, or contained in an
electronic device or service or an electronic
communication to the consumer, and
(2) available to the consumer immediately or after
the consumer completes a reasonable
authentication protocol used solely to confirm
that the consumer is authorized to make changes
to the account, or
b. an in-person mechanism for canceling an automatic
renewal contract or trial period offer, which
mechanism:
(1) is at a physical location where the consumer
regularly utilizes any goods or services that are
subject to the automatic renewal contract, and
(2) satisfies the requirements of this paragraph.
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.3 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 5

If a material change occurs in the terms of an automatic renewal
contract that has been accepted by a consumer in this state, the
person shall provide to the consumer, a clear and conspicuous notice
of the material change and information regarding cancellation of the
automatic renewal contract, including information concerning the
mechanism described in paragraph 4 of Section 3 of this act.
SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.4 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A person that sells a good or service to a consumer pursuant
to an automatic renewal contract shall notify the consumer that the
automatic renewal contract will automatically renew or continue
unless the consumer cancels the automatic renewal contract. The
notice must inform the consumer of the process for canceling the
automatic renewal contract, and the process must provide clear and
accurate information about the identity of the sender and be
consistent with paragraph 4 of Section 3 of this act. The person
shall provide the notice by:
1. Physical mail;
2. Electronic mail; or
3. Another easily accessible form of communication, such as a
text message or a mobile phone application, if the consumer
specifically authorizes the person to provide notice in such form or

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 6

if t he consumer customarily uses such form to communicate with the
person.
B. A person that sells a good or service to a consumer pursuant
to an automatic renewal contract shall send the notice described in
subsection A of this section at least fifteen (15) and no more than
forty-five (45) days for automatic renewal contracts with an initial
term of one (1) year that renew for more than one (1) month.
SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.5 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary,
this act does not apply to:
1. A service provided by a person pursuant to a franchise
issued by a political subdivision of the state or a license,
franchise, certificate, or other authorization issued by the
Oklahoma Corporation Commission;
2. A service provided by a person or an affiliate or subsidiary
thereof that is regulated by the Federal Communications Commission,
the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, or the Oklahoma
Corporation Commission;
3. Any person or entity regulated by the Oklahoma Insurance
Department, or an affiliate of that person or entity;


ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 7

4. A bank or bank holding company that is licensed under state
or federal law, or a subsidiary or affiliate of such a bank or bank
holding company;
5. A credit union or other financial institution that is
licensed under state or federal law;
6. An air carrier as defined in and regulated under the Federal
Aviation Act of 1958, 49 U.S.C., Section 40101 et seq., as amended,
including the federal Airline Deregulation Act of 1978, 49 U.S.C.,
Section 41713, as amended; or
7. An entity regulated by the Oklahoma Department of Labor
under the Alarm, Locksmith, and Fire Sprinkler Industry Act.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 773.6 of Title 15, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any violation of this act shall constitute an unlawful business
practice and shall be subject to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Consumer Protection Act.
SECTION 16. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.






ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 8

Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of _________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1851 Page 9